North Dakota, session 69, HB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated from special funds to the public employees retirement system for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the public employees retirement system, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $8,232,492 $1,689,590 $9,922,082
New and vacant FTE pool 0 607,917 607,917
Operating expenses 2,416,162 858,001 3,274,163
Contingencies 250,000 0 250,000
Total special funds $10,898,654 $3,155,508 $14,054,162
Full-time equivalent positions 40.50 2.00 42.50
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description Special Funds
Automate PERSLink business system $539,595
Total special funds $539,595
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The public
employees retirement system may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line
item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds
from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1023 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1023.
House Vote: Yeas 69 Nays 20 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 7 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State